Indiana, session 2026, SB253.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-56.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 56.8. Deed Fraud Task Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the deed
fraud task force established by section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. The deed fraud task force is established.
Sec. 3. (a) The task force consists of the following thirteen (13)
members:
(1) A member of the house of representatives who is
appointed to the task force by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(2) A member of the senate who is appointed to the task force
by the president pro tempore of the senate.
(3) A member of the house of representatives who is
appointed to the task force by the minority leader of the house
of representatives.
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


(4) A member of the senate who is appointed to the task force
by the minority leader of the senate.
(5) The chief justice of the supreme court or a designee of the
chief justice.
(6) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee.
(7) A representative from the state police department.
(8) The treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's designee.
(9) The following members who are appointed to the task
force by the governor:
(A) A notary public (as defined in IC 33-42-0.5-20).
(B) A title insurance agent (as defined in IC 35-43-9-4).
(C) A county recorder.
(D) A real estate broker licensed under IC 25-34.1.
(E) A representative from a consumer advocacy group that
represents the interests of consumers who are fifty (50)
years of age or older.
(b) The members appointed under subsection (a)(1) and (a)(2)
shall serve as co-chairs.
(c) A member appointed under subsection (a)(9) may not be a
member of the general assembly.
(d) A member serves at the will of the member's appointing
authority. If a vacancy occurs in the task force, the appointing
authority who appointed the member whose position is vacant shall
appoint an individual to fill the vacancy.
(e) An individual appointed to fill a vacancy must meet the
qualifications of the vacancy.
(f) An individual appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the
remainder of the term of the member the individual is appointed
to succeed.
Sec. 4. (a) Seven (7) members of the task force constitute a
quorum.
(b) The affirmative vote of at least a majority of the members at
a meeting at which a quorum is present is necessary for the task
force to take official action other than to meet and take testimony.
(c) The task force shall meet at the call of the co-chairs.
Sec. 5. All meetings of the task force are open to the public in
accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the task
force are subject to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
Sec. 6. The task force shall:
(1) assess the extent of deed fraud in Indiana; and
(2) consider approaches to reduce deed fraud in Indiana.
Sec. 7. The task force shall:
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


(1) develop recommendations for the legislative council
concerning the topics set forth in section 6 of this chapter;
(2) issue a report setting forth the recommendations
developed under subdivision (1); and
(3) not later than June 30, 2027, submit the report to the
legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 8. The legislative services agency shall provide staff support
to the task force.
Sec. 9. (a) Each legislative member and each lay member of the
task force is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and
travel allowances paid to individuals serving as legislative and lay
members, respectively, on an interim study committee established
by the legislative council.
(b) A member of the task force who is a state employee is not
entitled to a per diem. However, the member is entitled to receive
the same travel allowances paid to members of the task force
described in subsection (a).
Sec. 10. The task force's expenses, including the payment of per
diem and reimbursements under section 9 of this chapter, are
payable from amounts appropriated to the legislative council.
Sec. 11. This chapter expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 32-21-2-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Suspicious instrument" means an instrument (as defined
in section 1.5 of this chapter) for which the county recorder
has found any of the following:
(A) The name of a notarial officer or notary public who
has purported to acknowledge or verify the instrument
does not match official records.
(B) The instrument purports not to be subject to the laws
of the United States or Indiana.
(C) The instrument does not conform to the recording
standards enacted by the general assembly.
(D) The instrument has not been submitted for recording
by a trusted submitter or an authorized representative of
a trusted submitter and the instrument is materially false,
fictitious, or fraudulent.
(2) "Title insurance agent" means a person who holds a
limited lines producer's license issued under
IC 27-1-15.6-18(3) and disburses funds from a title insurance
escrow account to a party in connection with a real property
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


transaction.
(3) "Trusted submitter" means:
(A) a title insurance agent;
(B) a title company;
(C) an escrow company;
(D) an attorney licensed to practice law in Indiana; and
(E) a financial institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)).
(b) A county recorder may:
(1) refuse to record a suspicious instrument, unless a court of
competent jurisdiction finds that the county recorder's
finding that the instrument is a suspicious instrument is
erroneous;
(2) report a suspicious instrument to the appropriate law
enforcement agency; or
(3) notify a notarial officer or notary public who has
purported to acknowledge or prove a suspicious instrument
of the reason for the county recorder's finding that the
instrument is a suspicious instrument.
(c) A person may bring an action seeking a declaratory
judgment or injunctive relief against a county recorder for the
county recorder's refusal to record an instrument under this
section if the person believes that the county recorder erroneously
determined that the instrument is a suspicious instrument. A
county recorder is not liable for damages in an action brought
under this subsection.
SECTION 3. IC 32-21-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 2.2. Property Alert Notification System
Sec. 1. Not later than January 1, 2027, each county recorder in
Indiana shall establish a property alert notification system that
allows a person to enroll the person's real property in the system.
Sec. 2. A property alert notification system required to be
established under this chapter shall do the following:
(1) Notify a person that enrolls the person's real property in
a property alert notification system required to be established
under this chapter of the recording of any instrument (as
defined in IC 32-21-2-1.5) that affects or may affect the
person's real property.
(2) In the notification described in subdivision (1), identify the
nature of the instrument (as defined in IC 32-21-2-1.5),
identify the real property by address or tax identification
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


number, and provide the recording information of the
instrument (as defined in IC 32-21-2-1.5).
(3) Allow a person that enrolls the person's real property in a
property alert notification system required to be established
under this chapter to elect to receive the notification
described in subdivision (1) by mail, electronic mail, text
message, or telephone call.
Sec. 3. A charge may not be assessed to a person for enrolling
the person's real property in a property alert notification system
required to be established under this chapter.
Sec. 4. A county recorder may, through any medium, provide
property owners with:
(1) educational information on deed fraud; and
(2) information about the property alert notification system
that the county recorder is required to establish under this
chapter.
Sec. 5. (a) A county recorder is not liable for a violation of this
chapter.
(b) This section does not create a cause of action against a
county recorder regarding the establishment, maintenance, or
operation of a property alert notification system required to be
established under this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 32-21-2.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 2.3. Instrument Alert Notification System
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "instrument" has the meaning
set forth in IC 32-21-2-1.5.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "notary public" has the meaning
set forth in IC 33-42-0.5-20.
Sec. 3. Not later than January 1, 2027, each county recorder
shall establish an instrument alert notification system that does the
following:
(1) Notifies a notary public who enrolls in an instrument alert
notification system required to be established under this
chapter of the recording of any instrument containing the
name or commission number of the notary public.
(2) In the notification described in subdivision (1), identifies
the nature of the instrument, identifies the real property by
address or tax identification number, and provides the
recording information of the instrument.
(3) Allows a notary public who enrolls in an instrument alert
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


notification system required to be established under this
chapter to elect to receive the notification described in
subdivision (1) by mail, electronic mail, text message, or
telephone call.
Sec. 4. There shall be no charge assessed to a notary public for
enrolling in an instrument alert notification system required to be
established under this chapter.
Sec. 5. A county recorder may, through any medium, provide
notaries public with:
(1) educational information on deed fraud; and
(2) information about the instrument alert notification system
that the county recorder is required to establish under this
chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) A county recorder is not liable for a violation of this
chapter.
(b) This section does not create a cause of action against a
county recorder regarding the establishment, maintenance, or
operation of an instrument alert notification system required to be
established under this chapter.
SECTION 5. IC 33-42-9-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.59-2018,
SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A notarial officer has personal knowledge
of an individual's identity if the:
(1) individual is personally known to the notarial officer; or
(2) notarial officer has transacted sufficient, prior business with
the individual to know the individual's identity.
(b) If a notarial officer does not have personal knowledge of an
individual's identity, the notarial officer may authenticate the identity
of the individual through one (1) of the following means:
(1) An inspection of any of the following that, if expired, has not
been expired for more than three (3) years:
(A) The individual's passport.
(B) The individual's driver's license.
(C) The individual's government issued identification card.
(D) A credential that:
(i) is not described in clauses (A) through (C);
(ii) is government issued; and
(iii) contains a photograph of the individual.
(2) A verification on an oath or affirmation by a credible witness
who:
(A) personally:
(i) appears before the notarial officer; and
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


(ii) is personally known by the notarial officer; or
(B) is identified to the notarial officer by a credential
described in subdivision (1).
(c) A notarial officer may require an individual to provide additional
identification or information before performing a notarial act,
including providing sufficient information to conduct identity
proofing.
SECTION 6. IC 33-42-9-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.128-2017,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A notarial officer may refuse to perform a
notarial act if the notarial officer is not satisfied that:
(1) the individual executing the record is competent; or
(2) the individual's execution of the record is being done
knowingly or voluntarily; or
(3) the individual executing the record has provided sufficient
information to conduct identity proofing under section 4(c) of
this chapter.
(b) A notarial officer may refuse to perform a notarial act unless the
refusal is prohibited by law.
SECTION 7. IC 33-42-10-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) A notary public shall
present proof of the notary public's commission to a person that
sells or otherwise provides a stamping device to the notary public.
(b) A notary public shall retain the proof described in
subsection (a) for eight (8) years after providing the proof to a
person that sells or otherwise provides a stamping device to the
notary public.
(c) A person that sells or otherwise provides a stamping device
to a notary public shall retain the proof described in subsection (a)
for eight (8) years after receiving the proof from the notary public.
SECTION 8. IC 33-42-12-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. An applicant seeking a
commission as a notary public must complete a background check
administered by the secretary of state.
SECTION 9. IC 33-42-13-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.128-2017,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The secretary of state shall maintain an
electronic data base of active notaries public.
(b) The secretary of state shall require the use of a username
and password authentication for any person attempting to access
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


the electronic data base established under this section.
(c) In maintaining the data base established under this section,
the secretary of state shall establish and maintain a system of
security procedures and access controls. In establishing and
maintaining a system of security procedures and access controls,
the secretary of state shall consider the most recent standards
promulgated by national standard setting bodies, such as the
National Institute of Standards and Technology.
SECTION 10. IC 34-24-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 6.5. Deed Fraud
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "mortgage" means a mortgage
or mortgage lien on an interest in real property in Indiana given to
secure a loan.
Sec. 2. A person that alleges damages arising from the recording
of a forged deed or mortgage has a cause of action against any of
the following persons:
(1) The person who forged the signature of the person alleging
damages arising from the recording of a forged deed or
mortgage on a deed or mortgage.
(2) A person who, with actual knowledge that the deed or
mortgage included a forged signature, submitted the deed or
mortgage to a county recorder for recording under
IC 32-21-2.
(3) A person with actual knowledge that the title to the real
property is based on a forged deed, and who purports to sell
or encumber the property to someone who is unaware of the
forged deed.
Sec. 3. A plaintiff who prevails in an action under this chapter
is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and compensatory and
punitive damages.
SECTION 11. IC 34-30-2.1-521.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 521.3. IC 32-21-2-17 (Concerning
the recording of an instrument).
SECTION 12. IC 34-30-2.1-521.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 521.5. IC 32-21-2.2-5 (Concerning
a property alert notification system).
SECTION 13. IC 34-30-2.1-521.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 521.7. IC 32-21-2.3-6 (Concerning
an instrument alert notification system).
2026 IN 253—LS 7060/DI 154